Massachusetts, session 194th, H1639.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 85K of chapter 231 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 12, after the word “costs” the following words:-
provided, however, that claims of sexual abuse of a minor, as that term is defined in section 4C
of chapter 260, shall not be subject to a limitation on damages.
of 1